Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.160

Disciplinary action against pharmacist's and intern's licenses—Grounds.

In addition to the grounds under RCW 18.130.170 and 18.130.180, the commission may take disciplinary action against the license of any pharmacist or intern upon proof that:

(1) His or her license was procured through fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit;

(2) In the event that a pharmacist is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to be mentally incompetent, the pharmacist shall automatically have his or her license suspended by the commission upon the entry of the judgment, regardless of the pendency of an appeal;

(3) He or she has knowingly violated or permitted the violation of any provision of any state or federal law, rule, or regulation governing the possession, use, distribution, or dispensing of drugs, including, but not limited to, the violation of any provision of this chapter, Title 69 RCW, or rule or regulation of the commission;

(4) He or she has knowingly allowed any unlicensed person to take charge of a pharmacy or engage in the practice of pharmacy, except a pharmacy intern or pharmacy assistant acting as authorized in this chapter or chapter 18.64A RCW in the presence of and under the immediate supervision of a licensed pharmacist;

(5) He or she has compounded, dispensed, or caused the compounding or dispensing of any drug or device which contains more or less than the equivalent quantity of ingredient or ingredients specified by the person who prescribed such drug or device: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall be construed to prevent the pharmacist from exercising professional judgment in the preparation or providing of such drugs or devices.

[ 2013 c 19 s 13; 1993 c 367 s 13; 1985 c 7 s 60; 1984 c 153 s 12; 1979 c 90 s 13; 1963 c 38 s 10; 1909 c 213 s 10; RRS s 10143. Formerly RCW 18.64.160 through 18.64.190.]